Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "hospital" means a facility licensed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 216B as either an acute care hospital, psychiatric hospital, rehabilitation
hospital, or chemical dependency treatment facility.
(2) Any person who unlawfully possesses a controlled substance classified in
Schedules I or II in any hospital building, on hospital grounds, or on any
premises owned or controlled by a hospital shall be guilty of a Class D felony,
unless a more severe penalty is set forth in this chapter, in which case the higher
penalty shall apply.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any
misdemeanor offense relating to salvia.
(4) (a) Each hospital shall display in prominent locations, which may include
parking lots, lobbies, waiting rooms, and cafeterias, a sign at least six (6)
inches high and fourteen (14) inches wide stating:
UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF A
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ON HOSPITAL
PROPERTY IN KENTUCKY IS A FELONY PUNISHABLE
BY A MAXIMUM OF FIVE (5) YEARS IN PRISON AND A
TEN THOUSAND DOLLAR ($10,000) FINE.
(b) A hospital's failure to post the sign shall not be a defense to liability under
this section.
Section 2. KRS 218A.133 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Drug overdose" means an acute condition of physical illness, coma, mania,
Page 1 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
hysteria, seizure, cardiac arrest, cessation of breathing, or death which
reasonably appears to be the result of consumption or use of a controlled
substance, or another substance with which a controlled substance was
combined, and that a layperson would reasonably believe requires medical
assistance; and
(b) "Good faith" does not include seeking medical assistance during the course of
the execution of an arrest warrant, or search warrant, or a lawful search.
(2) A person shall not be charged with or prosecuted for a criminal offense prohibiting
the unlawful possession of a controlled substance or the possession of drug
paraphernalia, for a violation of KRS 507.030(1)(d) or 507.040(1)(d), or for an
offense punishable under KRS 218A.1412(3)(c) if:
(a) In good faith, medical assistance with a drug overdose is sought from a public
safety answering point, emergency medical services, a law enforcement
officer, or a health practitioner because the person:
1. Requests emergency medical assistance for himself or herself or another
person;
2. Acts in concert with another person who requests emergency medical
assistance; or
3. Appears to be in need of emergency medical assistance and is the
individual for whom the request was made;
(b) The person remains with, or is, the individual who appears to be experiencing
a drug overdose until the requested assistance is provided; and
(c) The evidence for the charge or prosecution is obtained as a result of the drug
overdose and the need for medical assistance.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not extend to the investigation
and prosecution of any other crimes committed by a person who otherwise qualifies
under this section.
Page 2 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(4) When contact information is available for the person who requested emergency
medical assistance, it shall be reported to the local health department. Health
department personnel shall make contact with the person who requested emergency
medical assistance in order to offer referrals regarding substance abuse treatment, if
appropriate.
(5) A law enforcement officer who makes an arrest in contravention of this section
shall not be criminally or civilly liable for false arrest or false imprisonment if the
arrest was based on probable cause.
Section 3. KRS 218A.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a controlled substance in the first
degree when he or she knowingly and unlawfully possesses[:
(a) ] a controlled substance that is classified in Schedules I or II and is a narcotic
drug[;
(b) A controlled substance analogue;
(c) Methamphetamine;
(d) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(e) Phencyclidine;
(f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), including its salts, isomers, salts of
isomers, and analogues; or
(g) Flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers].
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, unlawful possession of a
controlled substance in the first degree is a Class D felony subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The maximum term of incarceration shall be no greater than three (3) years,
notwithstanding KRS Chapter 532;
(b) For a person's first or second offense under this section, he or she may be
subject to a period of:
Page 3 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
1. Deferred prosecution pursuant to KRS 218A.14151; or
2. Presumptive probation;
(c) Deferred prosecution under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be the
preferred alternative for a first offense; and
(d) If a person does not enter a deferred prosecution program for his or her first or
second offense, he or she shall be subject to a period of presumptive
probation, unless a court determines the defendant is not eligible for
presumptive probation as defined in KRS 218A.010.
(3) (a) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in any hospital building, on
hospital grounds, or on any premises owned or controlled by a hospital is a
Class D felony, unless a more severe penalty is set forth in this chapter, in
which case the higher penalty shall apply.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hospital" means a facility licensed pursuant to
KRS Chapter 216B as either an acute care hospital, psychiatric hospital,
rehabilitation hospital, or chemical dependency treatment facility.
Section 4. KRS 218A.1416 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a controlled substance in the second
degree when he or she knowingly and unlawfully possesses:
(a) A controlled substance classified in Schedules I or II which is not a narcotic
drug and not a synthetic drug, salvia, or marijuana;[ or specified in KRS
218A.1415; or]
(b) A controlled substance classified in Schedule III;[ but not synthetic drugs,
salvia, or marijuana.]
(c) A controlled substance analogue;
(d) Methamphetamine;
(e) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(f) Phencyclidine;
Page 4 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(g) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), including its salts, isomers, salts of
isomers, and analogues; or
(h) Flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
(2) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in the second degree is a Class A
misdemeanor.
Section 5. KRS 218A.1417 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a controlled substance in the third
degree when he or she knowingly and unlawfully possesses a controlled substance
classified in Schedules IV or V.
(2) Unlawful possession of a controlled substance in the third degree is a Class A
misdemeanor.
Section 6. KRS 218A.202 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(b) "Cannabis business" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(c) "Controlled substance" means any Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled
substance and does not include medicinal cannabis;
(d) "Dispensary" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(e) "Dispensary agent" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(f) "Disqualifying felony offense" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(g) "Medicinal cannabis" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(h) "Medicinal cannabis practitioner" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(i) "Registry identification card" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(j) "State licensing board" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(k) "Use of medicinal cannabis" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010; and
(l) "Written certification" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010.
(2) The cabinet shall establish and maintain an electronic system for monitoring
Page 5 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
Schedules II, III, IV, and V controlled substances and medicinal cannabis. The
cabinet may contract for the design, upgrade, or operation of this system if the
contract preserves all of the rights, privileges, and protections guaranteed to
Kentucky citizens under this chapter and the contract requires that all other aspects
of the system be operated in conformity with the requirements of this or any other
applicable state or federal law.
(3) For the purpose of monitoring the prescribing and dispensing of Schedule II, III, IV,
or V controlled substances:
(a) A practitioner or a pharmacist authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances to humans shall register with the cabinet to use the system
provided for in this section and shall maintain such registration continuously
during the practitioner's or pharmacist's term of licensure and shall not have to
pay a fee or tax specifically dedicated to the operation of the system;
(b) Every practitioner or pharmacy which dispenses a controlled substance to a
person in Kentucky, or to a person at an address in Kentucky, shall report to
the cabinet the data required by this section, which includes the reporting of
any Schedule II controlled substance dispensed at a facility licensed by the
cabinet and a Schedule II through Schedule V controlled substance regardless
of dosage when dispensed by the emergency department of a hospital to an
emergency department patient. Reporting shall not be required for:
1. A drug administered directly to a patient in a hospital, a resident of a
health care facility licensed under KRS Chapter 216B, a resident of a
child-caring facility as defined by KRS 199.011, or an individual in a
jail, correctional facility, or juvenile detention facility;
2. A Schedule III through Schedule V controlled substance dispensed by a
facility licensed by the cabinet provided that the quantity dispensed is
limited to an amount adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of
Page 6 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
forty-eight (48) hours and is not dispensed by the emergency department
of a hospital; or
3. A drug administered or dispensed to a research subject enrolled in a
research protocol approved by an institutional review board that has an
active federalwide assurance number from the United States Department
of Health and Human Services, Office for Human Research Protections,
where the research involves single, double, or triple blind drug
administration or is additionally covered by a certificate of
confidentiality from the National Institutes of Health;
(c) In addition to the data required by paragraph (d) of this subsection, a
Kentucky-licensed acute care hospital or critical access hospital shall report to
the cabinet all positive toxicology screens that were performed by the
hospital's emergency department to evaluate the patient's suspected drug
overdose;
(d) Data for each controlled substance that is reported shall include but not be
limited to the following:
1. Patient identifier;
2. National drug code of the drug dispensed;
3. Date of dispensing;
4. Quantity dispensed;
5. Prescriber; and
6. Dispenser;
(e) The data shall be provided in the electronic format specified by the cabinet
unless a waiver has been granted by the cabinet to an individual dispenser.
The cabinet shall establish acceptable error tolerance rates for data.
Dispensers shall ensure that reports fall within these tolerances. Incomplete or
inaccurate data shall be corrected upon notification by the cabinet if the
Page 7 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
dispenser exceeds these error tolerance rates;
(f) The cabinet shall only disclose data to persons and entities authorized to
receive that data under this subsection. Disclosure to any other person or
entity, including disclosure in the context of a civil action where the
disclosure is sought either for the purpose of discovery or for evidence, is
prohibited unless specifically authorized by this section. The cabinet shall be
authorized to provide data to:
1. A designated representative of a board responsible for the licensure,
regulation, or discipline of practitioners, pharmacists, or other person
who is authorized to prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled
substances and who is involved in a bona fide specific investigation
involving a designated person;
2. Employees of the Office of the Inspector General of the cabinet who
have successfully completed training for the electronic system and who
have been approved to use the system, federal prosecutors, Kentucky
Commonwealth's attorneys and assistant Commonwealth's attorneys,
county attorneys and assistant county attorneys, a peace officer certified
pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404, a certified or full-time peace officer
of another state, or a federal agent whose duty is to enforce the laws of
this Commonwealth, of another state, or of the United States relating to
drugs and who is engaged in a bona fide specific investigation involving
a designated person;
3. A state-operated Medicaid program in conformity with paragraph (g) of
this subsection;
4. A properly convened grand jury pursuant to a subpoena properly issued
for the records;
5. A practitioner or pharmacist, or employee of the practitioner's or
Page 8 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
pharmacist's practice acting under the specific direction of the
practitioner or pharmacist, who certifies that the requested information
is for the purpose of:
a. Providing medical or pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide
current or prospective patient;
b. Reviewing data on controlled substances that have been reported
for the birth mother of an infant who is currently being treated by
the practitioner for neonatal abstinence syndrome, or has
symptoms that suggest prenatal drug exposure; or
c. Reviewing and assessing the individual prescribing or dispensing
patterns of the practitioner or pharmacist or to determine the
accuracy and completeness of information contained in the
monitoring system;
6. The chief medical officer of a hospital or long-term-care facility, an
employee of the hospital or long-term-care facility as designated by the
chief medical officer and who is working under his or her specific
direction, or a physician designee if the hospital or facility has no chief
medical officer, if the officer, employee, or designee certifies that the
requested information is for the purpose of providing medical or
pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide current or prospective patient or
resident in the hospital or facility;
7. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure, for any physician
who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a
physician who is already under investigation by the Board of
Medical Licensure for improper prescribing or dispensing
Page 9 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
practices;
b. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates
a substantial likelihood that inappropriate prescribing or
dispensing may be occurring; or
c. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another
physician in that area indicates a substantial likelihood that
inappropriate prescribing or dispensing may be occurring in that
area;
8. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the Kentucky Board of Nursing, for any advanced practice
registered nurse who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a
physician who is already under investigation by the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure for improper prescribing or
dispensing practices;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an
advanced practice registered nurse who is already under
investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper prescribing
practices;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates
a substantial likelihood that inappropriate prescribing or
dispensing may be occurring; or
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on a physician
or another advanced practice registered nurse in that area indicates
a substantial likelihood that inappropriate prescribing or
dispensing may be occurring in that area;
9. A judge or a probation or parole officer administering a diversion or
Page 10 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
probation program of a criminal defendant arising out of a violation of
this chapter or of a criminal defendant who is documented by the court
as a substance abuser who is eligible to participate in a court-ordered
drug diversion or probation program; or
10. A medical examiner engaged in a death investigation pursuant to KRS
72.026;
(g) The Department for Medicaid Services shall use any data or reports from the
system for the purpose of identifying Medicaid providers or recipients whose
prescribing, dispensing, or usage of controlled substances may be:
1. Appropriately managed by a single outpatient pharmacy or primary care
physician; or
2. Indicative of improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or
dispensing practices by a practitioner or drug seeking by a Medicaid
recipient;
(h) A person who receives data or any report of the system from the cabinet shall
not provide it to any other person or entity except as provided in this
subsection, in another statute, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction
and only to a person or entity authorized to receive the data or the report
under this section, except that:
1. A person specified in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection who is
authorized to receive data or a report may share that information with
any other persons specified in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection
authorized to receive data or a report if the persons specified in
paragraph (f)2. of this subsection are working on a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person. Both the person providing
and the person receiving the data or report under this subparagraph shall
document in writing each person to whom the data or report has been
Page 11 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
given or received and the day, month, and year that the data or report
has been given or received. This document shall be maintained in a file
by each agency engaged in the investigation;
2. A representative of the Department for Medicaid Services may share
data or reports regarding overutilization by Medicaid recipients with a
board designated in paragraph (f)1. of this subsection, or with a law
enforcement officer designated in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection;
3. The Department for Medicaid Services may submit the data as evidence
in an administrative hearing held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
4. If a state licensing board as defined in KRS 218A.205 initiates formal
disciplinary proceedings against a licensee, and data obtained by the
board is relevant to the charges, the board may provide the data to the
licensee and his or her counsel, as part of the notice process required by
KRS 13B.050, and admit the data as evidence in an administrative
hearing conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, with the board and
licensee taking all necessary steps to prevent further disclosure of the
data; and
5. A practitioner, pharmacist, or employee who obtains data under
paragraph (f)5. of this subsection may share the report with the patient
or person authorized to act on the patient's behalf. Any practitioner,
pharmacist, or employee who obtains data under paragraph (f)5. of this
subsection may place the report in the patient's medical record, in which
case the individual report shall then be deemed a medical record subject
to disclosure on the same terms and conditions as an ordinary medical
record in lieu of the disclosure restrictions otherwise imposed by this
section;
(i) The cabinet, all peace officers specified in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection,
Page 12 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
all officers of the court, and all regulatory agencies and officers, in using the
data for investigative or prosecution purposes, shall consider the nature of the
prescriber's and dispenser's practice and the condition for which the patient is
being treated;
(j) Intentional failure to comply with the reporting requirements of this
subsection shall be a Class B misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A
misdemeanor for each subsequent offense; and
(k) If the cabinet becomes aware of a prescriber's or dispenser's failure to comply
with this section, the cabinet shall notify the licensing board or agency
responsible for licensing the prescriber or dispenser. The licensing board shall
treat the notification as a complaint against the license.
(4) For the purpose of monitoring the cultivation, processing, production,
recommending, and dispensing of medicinal cannabis:
(a) Every medicinal cannabis practitioner who is authorized pursuant to KRS
218B.050 to provide written certifications for the use of medicinal cannabis
and every cannabis business licensed under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090 shall register with the cabinet to use the system provided for in this
section and shall maintain such registration continuously during the medicinal
cannabis practitioner's authorization to provide written certifications or a
cannabis business's term of licensure and shall not have to pay a fee or tax
specifically dedicated to the operation of the system;
(b) No later than July 1, 2024, the cabinet shall ensure that the system provided
for in this section allows:
1. Medicinal cannabis practitioners to record the issuance of written
certifications to a patient as required by KRS 218B.050;
2. The cabinet, law enforcement personnel, and dispensary agents to verify
the validity of registry identification cards issued by the cabinet. When
Page 13 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
verifying the validity of an identification card, the system shall only
disclose whether the identification card is valid and whether the
cardholder is a registered qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or
designated caregiver;
3. Dispensary agents to record the amount of medicinal cannabis that is
dispensed to a cardholder during each transaction, as required by KRS
218B.110;
4. Law enforcement personnel and dispensary agents to access medicinal
cannabis sales data recorded by dispensary agents pursuant to KRS
218B.110;
5. The sharing of dispensing data recorded by dispensary agents, pursuant
to KRS 218B.110, with all licensed dispensaries in real time;
6. Licensed cannabis businesses to record data required by administrative
regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.140 to facilitate the
tracking of medicinal cannabis from the point of cultivation to the point
of sale to cardholders; and
7. The cabinet to track all medicinal cannabis in the state from the point of
cultivation to the point of sale to a cardholder;
(c) The cabinet shall only disclose data related to the cultivation, production,
recommending, and dispensing of medicinal cannabis to persons and entities
authorized to receive that data under this subsection. Disclosure to any other
person or entity, including disclosure in the context of a civil action where the
disclosure is sought either for the purpose of discovery or for evidence, is
prohibited unless specifically authorized by this subsection. The cabinet shall
be authorized to provide data to:
1. Any person or entity authorized to receive data pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection;
Page 14 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
2. A designated representative of a state licensing board responsible for the
licensure, regulation, or discipline of medicinal cannabis practitioners
and who is involved in a bona fide specific investigation involving a
designated person;
3. Employees of the Office of the Inspector General of the cabinet who
have successfully completed training for the electronic system and who
have been approved to use the system, Kentucky Commonwealth's
attorneys and assistant Commonwealth's attorneys, and county attorneys
and assistant county attorneys who are engaged in a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person;
4. A properly convened grand jury pursuant to a subpoena properly issued
for the records;
5. A medicinal cannabis practitioner or an employee of a medicinal
cannabis practitioner's practice acting under the specific direction of the
medicinal cannabis practitioner, who certifies that the request for
information is for the purpose of complying with KRS 218B.050(4)(c);
6. The chief medical officer of a hospital or long-term-care facility, an
employee of the hospital or long-term-care facility as designated by the
chief medical officer and who is working under his or her specific
direction, or a physician designee if the hospital or facility has no chief
medical officer, if the officer, employee, or designee certifies that the
requested information is for the purpose of providing medical or
pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide current or prospective patient or
resident in the hospital or facility;
7. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph, the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure, for any physician
who is:
Page 15 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
a. Associated in a partnership, other business entity, or supervision
agreement established pursuant to KRS 311.854 with a physician
who is already under investigation by the Board of Medical
Licensure for improper issuance of written certifications;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an
advanced practice registered nurse who is already under
investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper issuance of
written certifications;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates
a substantial likelihood that inappropriate issuance of written
certifications may be occurring; or
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another
physician in that area indicates a substantial likelihood that
inappropriate issuance of written certifications may be occurring in
that area;
8. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph, the Kentucky Board of Nursing, for any advanced practice
registered nurse who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a
physician who is already under investigation by the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure for improper issuance of written
certifications;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an
advanced practice registered nurse who is already under
investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper issuance of
written certifications;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates
Page 16 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
a substantial likelihood that inappropriate issuance of written
certifications may be occurring; or
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another
advanced practice registered nurse in that area indicates a
substantial likelihood that inappropriate issuance of written
certifications may be occurring in that area;
9. A judge or a probation or parole officer administering a diversion or
probation program of a criminal defendant arising out of a violation of
this chapter or of a criminal defendant who is documented by the court
as a substance abuser who is eligible to participate in a court-ordered
drug diversion or probation program;
10. A medical examiner engaged in a death investigation pursuant to KRS
72.026; or
11. The Legislative Research Commission, the University of Kentucky
College of Medicine, or the Kentucky Center for Cannabis established
in KRS 164.983 if the cabinet determines that disclosing data related to
the cultivation, production, recommending, and dispensing of medicinal
cannabis to the Legislative Research Commission, the University of
Kentucky College of Medicine, or the Kentucky Center for Cannabis is
necessary to comply with the reporting requirements established in KRS
218B.020(8); and
(d) A person who receives data or any report of the system from the cabinet shall
not provide it to any other person or entity except as provided in this section,
in another statute, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction and only to
a person or entity authorized to receive the data or the report under this
section, except that:
1. A person specified in paragraph (c)3. of this subsection who is
Page 17 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
authorized to receive data or a report may share that information with
any other persons specified in paragraph (c)3. of this subsection
authorized to receive data or a report if the persons specified in
paragraph (c)3. of this subsection are working on a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person. Both the person providing
and the person receiving the data or report under this subparagraph shall
document in writing each person to whom the data or report has been
given or received and the day, month, and year that the data or report
has been given or received. This document shall be maintained in a file
by each agency engaged in the investigation;
2. If a state licensing board initiates formal disciplinary proceedings
against a licensee, and data obtained by the board is relevant to the
charges, the board may provide the data to the licensee and his or her
counsel, as part of the notice process required by KRS 13B.050, and
admit the data as evidence in an administrative hearing conducted
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, with the board and licensee taking all
necessary steps to prevent further disclosure of the data; and
3. A medicinal cannabis practitioner or an employee of a medicinal
cannabis practitioner's practice acting under the specific direction of the
medicinal cannabis practitioner who obtains data under paragraph (c)5.
of this subsection may share the report with the patient or person
authorized to act on the patient's behalf. Any medicinal cannabis
practitioner or employee who obtains data under paragraph (c)5. of this
subsection may place the report in the patient's medical record, in which
case the individual report shall then be deemed a medical record subject
to disclosure on the same terms and conditions as an ordinary medical
record in lieu of the disclosure restrictions otherwise imposed by this
Page 18 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
section.
(5) The data contained in, and any report obtained from, the electronic system for
monitoring established pursuant to this section shall not be a public record, except
that the Department for Medicaid Services may submit the data as evidence in an
administrative hearing held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(6) Intentional disclosure of transmitted data to a person not authorized by subsection
(3)(f) to (h) or (4)(c) and (d) of this section or authorized by KRS 315.121, or
obtaining information under this section not relating to a bona fide current or
prospective patient or a bona fide specific investigation, shall be a Class B
misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for each subsequent
offense.
(7) The cabinet may, by promulgating an administrative regulation, limit the length of
time that data remain in the electronic system. Any data removed from the system
shall be archived and subject to retrieval within a reasonable time after a request
from a person authorized to review data under this section.
(8) (a) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall work with each board
responsible for the licensure, regulation, or discipline of practitioners,
pharmacists, or other persons who are authorized to prescribe, administer, or
dispense controlled substances for the development of a continuing education
program about the purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring
established in this section.
(b) The cabinet shall work with each board responsible for the licensure,
regulation, or discipline of medicinal cannabis practitioners for the
development of a continuing education program about the purposes and uses
of the electronic system for monitoring established in this section.
(c) The cabinet shall work with the Kentucky Bar Association for the
development of a continuing education program for attorneys about the
Page 19 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring established in this
section.
(d) The cabinet shall work with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for the
development of a continuing education program for law enforcement officers
about the purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring
established in this section.
(e) The cabinet shall develop a training program for cannabis business agents
about the purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring
established in this section.
(9) The cabinet, Office of Inspector General, shall conduct quarterly reviews to identify
patterns of potential improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing of
a controlled substance, issuance of written certifications, or cultivation, processing,
or dispensing of medicinal cannabis. The Office of Inspector General may
independently investigate and submit findings and recommendations to the
appropriate boards of licensure or other reporting agencies.
(10) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the
provisions of this section. Included in these administrative regulations shall be:
(a) An error resolution process allowing a patient to whom a report had been
disclosed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section to request the correction
of inaccurate information contained in the system relating to that patient; and
(b) A requirement that data be reported to the system under subsection (3)(b) of
this section within one (1) day of dispensing.
(11) (a) [Before July 1, 2018, ]The Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward
data regarding any felony or Class A misdemeanor conviction that involves
the trafficking or unlawful possession of a controlled substance or other
prohibited acts under KRS Chapter 218A for the previous five (5) calendar
years to the cabinet for inclusion in the electronic monitoring system
Page 20 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
established under this section. The[On or after July 1, 2018, such] data shall
be forwarded by the Administrative Office of the Courts to the cabinet on a
continuing basis. The cabinet shall incorporate the data received into the
system so that a query by patient name indicates any prior drug conviction.
(b) [Before July 1, 2024, ]The Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward
all available data regarding any disqualifying felony offense for the previous
five (5) calendar years to the cabinet for inclusion in the electronic monitoring
system established under this section. The[On or after July 1, 2024, such] data
shall be forwarded by the Administrative Office of the Courts to the cabinet
on a continuing basis. The cabinet shall incorporate the data received into the
system so that a query by patient name indicates any prior disqualifying
felony conviction.
Section 7. KRS 218A.205 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Reporting agency" includes:
1. The Department of Kentucky State Police;
2. The Office of the Attorney General;
3. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
4. The applicable state licensing board; and
(b) "State licensing board" means:
1. The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure;
2. The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
3. The Kentucky Board of Dentistry;
4. The Kentucky Board of Optometric Examiners;
5. The State Board of Podiatry; and
6. Any other board that licenses or regulates a person who is entitled to
prescribe or dispense controlled substances to humans.
Page 21 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(2) (a) When a reporting agency or a law enforcement agency receives a report of
improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing of a controlled
substance it may, to the extent otherwise allowed by law, send a copy of the
report within three (3) business days to every other reporting agency.
(b) A county attorney or Commonwealth's attorney shall notify the Office of the
Attorney General and the appropriate state licensing board within three (3)
business days of an indictment or a waiver of indictment becoming public in
his or her jurisdiction charging a licensed person with a felony offense
relating to the manufacture of, trafficking in, prescribing, dispensing, or
unlawful possession of a controlled substance.
(3) Each state licensing board shall, in consultation with the Kentucky Office of Drug
Control Policy, establish the following by administrative regulation for those
licensees authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances:
(a) Mandatory prescribing and dispensing standards related to controlled
substances, the requirements of which shall include the diagnostic, treatment,
review, and other protocols and standards established for Schedule II
controlled substances and Schedule III controlled substances containing
hydrocodone under KRS 218A.172 and which may include the exemptions
authorized by KRS 218A.172(4);
(b) In accord with the CDC Guideline for Prescribing Opioids for Chronic Pain
published in 2016, a prohibition on a practitioner issuing a prescription for a
Schedule II controlled substance for more than a three (3) day supply of a
Schedule II controlled substance if the prescription is intended to treat pain as
an acute medical condition, with the following exceptions:
1. The practitioner, in his or her professional judgment, believes that more
than a three (3) day supply of a Schedule II controlled substance is
medically necessary to treat the patient's pain as an acute medical
Page 22 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
condition and the practitioner adequately documents the acute medical
condition and lack of alternative treatment options which justifies
deviation from the three (3) day supply limit established in this
subsection in the patient's medical records;
2. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to
treat chronic pain;
3. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to
treat pain associated with a valid cancer diagnosis;
4. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to
treat pain while the patient is receiving hospice or end-of-life treatment
or is receiving care from a certified community based palliative care
program;
5. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed as
part of a narcotic treatment program licensed by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services;
6. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to
treat pain following a major surgery or the treatment of significant
trauma, as defined by the state licensing board in consultation with the
Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy;
7. The Schedule II controlled substance is dispensed or administered
directly to an ultimate user in an inpatient setting; or
8. Any additional treatment scenario deemed medically necessary by the
state licensing board in consultation with the Kentucky Office of Drug
Control Policy.
[Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not authorize a state licensing board to
promulgate regulations which expand any practitioner's prescriptive authority
beyond that which existed prior to June 29, 2017;
Page 23 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(c) A prohibition on a practitioner dispensing greater than a forty-eight (48) hour
supply of any Schedule II controlled substance or a Schedule III controlled
substance containing hydrocodone unless the dispensing is done as part of a
narcotic treatment program licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(d) A procedure for temporarily suspending, limiting, or restricting a license held
by a named licensee where a substantial likelihood exists to believe that the
continued unrestricted practice by the named licensee would constitute a
danger to the health, welfare, or safety of the licensee's patients or of the
general public;
(e) A procedure for the expedited review of complaints filed against their
licensees pertaining to the improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or
dispensing of controlled substances that is designed to commence an
investigation within seven (7) days of a complaint being filed and produce a
charging decision by the board on the complaint within one hundred twenty
(120) days of the receipt of the complaint, unless an extension for a definite
period of time is requested by a law enforcement agency due to an ongoing
criminal investigation;
(f) The establishment and enforcement of licensure standards that conform to the
following:
1. A permanent ban on licensees and applicants convicted after July 20,
2012, in this state or any other state of any felony offense relating to
controlled substances from prescribing or dispensing a controlled
substance;
2. Restrictions short of a permanent ban on licensees and applicants
convicted in this state or any other state of any misdemeanor offense
relating to prescribing or dispensing a controlled substance;
Page 24 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
3. Restrictions mirroring in time and scope any disciplinary limitation
placed on a licensee or applicant by a licensing board of another state if
the disciplinary action results from improper, inappropriate, or illegal
prescribing or dispensing of controlled substances; and
4. A requirement that licensees and applicants report to the board any
conviction or disciplinary action covered by this subsection with
appropriate sanctions for any failure to make this required report;
(g) A procedure for the continuous submission of all disciplinary and other
reportable information to the National Practitioner Data Bank of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services;
(h) If not otherwise required by other law, a process for submitting a query on
each applicant for licensure to the National Practitioner Data Bank of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services to retrieve any
relevant data on the applicant; and
(i) Continuing education requirements beginning with the first full educational
year occurring after July 1, 2012, that specify that at least seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) of the continuing education required of the licensed
practitioner relate to the use of the electronic monitoring system established in
KRS 218A.202, pain management, or addiction disorders.
(4) For the purposes of pharmacy dispensing, the medical necessity for a Schedule II
controlled substance as documented by the practitioner in the patient's medical
record and the prescription for more than a three (3) day supply of that controlled
substance are presumed to be valid.
(5) A state licensing board shall employ or obtain the services of a specialist in the
treatment of pain and a specialist in drug addiction to evaluate information received
regarding a licensee's prescribing or dispensing practices related to controlled
substances if the board or its staff does not possess such expertise, to ascertain if the
Page 25 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
licensee under investigation is engaging in improper, inappropriate, or illegal
practices.
(6) Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, a[no] state licensing board shall not
require that a grievance or complaint against a licensee relating to controlled
substances be sworn to or notarized, but the grievance or complaint shall identify
the name and address of the grievant or complainant, unless the board by
administrative regulation authorizes the filing of anonymous complaints. Any[
such] authorizing administrative regulation shall require that an anonymous
complaint or grievance be accompanied by sufficient corroborating evidence as
would allow the board to believe, based upon a totality of the circumstances, that a
reasonable probability exists that the complaint or grievance is meritorious.
(7) Every state licensing board shall cooperate to the maximum extent permitted by law
with all state, local, and federal law enforcement agencies, and all professional
licensing boards and agencies, state and federal, in the United States or its
territories in the coordination of actions to deter the improper, inappropriate, or
illegal prescribing or dispensing of a controlled substance.
(8) Each state licensing board shall require a fingerprint-supported criminal record
check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation of any applicant for initial licensure to practice any profession
authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances.
Section 8. KRS 218A.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A court may request the Division of Probation and Parole to perform a risk
and needs assessment for any person found guilty of unlawful possession of a
controlled substance pursuant to KRS 218A.1415, 218A.1416, or 218A.1417.
The assessor shall make a recommendation to the court as to whether
treatment is indicated by the assessment, and, if so, the most appropriate
treatment or recovery program environment. If treatment is indicated[ for the
Page 26 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
person], the court may order the person[him or her] to the appropriate
treatment or recovery program that will effectively respond to the person's
level of risk, criminal risk factors, and individual characteristics as designated
by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services where a
program of treatment or recovery not to exceed one (1) year in duration may
be prescribed.
(b) The person ordered to the designated treatment or recovery program shall
present himself or herself for registration and initiation of the treatment or
recovery program within five (5) days of the date of sentencing. If, without
good cause, the person fails to appear at the designated treatment or recovery
program within the specified time, or if at any time during the program of
treatment or recovery prescribed, the authorized director of the treatment or
recovery program finds that the person is unwilling to participate in his or her
treatment, the director shall notify the sentencing court. Upon receipt of
notification, the court shall cause the person to be brought before it and may
continue the order of treatment, or may rescind the treatment order and
impose a sentence for the possession offense.
(c) Upon discharge of the person from the treatment or recovery program by the
secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or his or her
designee, prior to the expiration of the one (1) year period or upon satisfactory
completion of one (1) year of treatment, the person shall be deemed finally
discharged from sentence. The secretary, or his or her designee, shall notify
the sentencing court of the date of[ such] discharge from the treatment or
recovery program.
(2) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or his or her designee,
shall inform each court of the identity and location of the treatment or recovery
program to which the person is sentenced.
Page 27 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(3) Transportation to an inpatient facility shall be provided by order of the court when
the court finds the person unable to convey himself or herself to the facility within
five (5) days of sentencing by reason of physical infirmity or financial incapability.
(4) The sentencing court shall immediately notify the designated treatment or recovery
program of the sentence and its effective date.
(5) The secretary for health and family services, or his or her designee, may authorize
transfer of the person from the initially designated treatment or recovery program to
another treatment or recovery program for therapeutic purposes. The sentencing
court shall be notified of termination of treatment by the terminating treatment or
recovery program and shall be notified by the secretary of the new treatment or
recovery program to which the person was transferred.
(6) Responsibility for payment for treatment services rendered to persons pursuant to
this section shall be as under the statutes pertaining to payment of patients and
others for services rendered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, unless
the person and the treatment or recovery program shall arrange otherwise.
(7) [None of ]The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to preclude the court
from exercising its usual discretion with regard to ordering probation or conditional
discharge.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, in the case of any person who
has been convicted for the first time of unlawful possession of a controlled
substance[substances], the court may set aside and void the conviction upon
satisfactory completion of treatment, probation, or other sentence, and issue to the
person a certificate to that effect. A conviction voided under this subsection shall
not be deemed a first offense for purposes of this chapter or deemed a conviction
for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a
crime. Voiding of a conviction under this subsection and dismissal may occur only
once with respect to any person.
Page 28 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(9) If the court voids a conviction under this section, the court shall order the sealing of
all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other
agency or official, including law enforcement records, except as provided in KRS
27A.099. The court shall order the sealing on a form provided by the
Administrative Office of the Courts. Every agency with records relating to the
arrest, charge, or other matters arising out of the arrest or charge that is ordered to
seal records[,] shall certify to the court within sixty (60) days of the entry of the
order that the required sealing action has been completed.
(10) After the sealing of the record, the proceedings in the matter shall not be used
against the defendant except for the purposes of determining the person's eligibility
to have his or her conviction voided under subsection (8) of this section. The court
and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The
person whose record has been sealed shall not have to disclose the fact of the record
or any matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other
type of application.
(11) Inspection of the sealed records may thereafter be permitted by the court pursuant
to KRS 27A.099 or upon a motion by the person who is the subject of the records
and only to those persons named in the motion or upon a motion of the prosecutor
to verify a defendant's eligibility to have his or her conviction voided under
subsection (8) of this section.
(12) A person who has previously had a charge of unlawful possession of a controlled
substance[substances] dismissed after completion of a deferred prosecution under
KRS 218A.14151 shall not be eligible for voiding of conviction under this section.
Section 9. KRS 218A.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 218A.510:
(1) "Drug paraphernalia" means all equipment, products and materials of any kind
which are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
Page 29 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting,
producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,
storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise
introducing into the human body a controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
The term "drug paraphernalia" does not include medicinal cannabis accessories as
defined in KRS 218B.010. It includes but is not limited to:
(a) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which is a
controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be derived;
(b) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in manufacturing,
compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing controlled
substances;
(c) Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in increasing
the potency of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;
(d) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, testing equipment used,
intended for use, or designed for use in analyzing the strength, effectiveness,
or purity of controlled substances;
(e) Scales and balances used, intended for use, or designed for use in weighing or
measuring controlled substances;
(f) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite,
dextrose and lactose, used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting
controlled substances;
(g) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or designed for use in
removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining
marijuana;
(h) Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing devices used, intended for
use, or designed for use in compounding controlled substances;
Page 30 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
(i) Capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers used, intended for use, or
designed for use in packaging small quantities of controlled substances;
(j) Containers and other objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
storing or concealing controlled substances;
(k) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended for use, or
designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances into the human
body; and
(l) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling, or
otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil into the
human body, such as: metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic
pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured
metal bowls; water pipes; carburetion tubes and devices; smoking and
carburetion masks; roach clips which mean objects used to hold burning
material, such as marijuana cigarettes, that have become too small or too short
to be held in the hand; miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials; chamber
pipes; carburetor pipes; electric pipes; air-driven pipes; chillums; bongs; ice
pipes or chillers.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to use, or to possess with intent to use, drug
paraphernalia for the purpose of planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packing, repacking, storing, containing, concealing,
injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or
manufacture with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under
circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant,
propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce,
Page 31 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest,
inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance in
violation of this chapter.
(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or
other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one
reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part,
is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia.
(5) (a) This section shall not prohibit a local health department from operating a
substance abuse treatment outreach program which allows participants to
exchange hypodermic needles and syringes.
(b) To operate a substance abuse treatment outreach program under this
subsection, the local health department shall have the consent, which may be
revoked at any time, of the local board of health and:
1. The legislative body of the first or home rule class city in which the
program would operate if located in such a city; and
2. The legislative body of the county, urban-county government, or
consolidated local government in which the program would operate.
(c) Items exchanged at the program shall not be deemed drug paraphernalia under
this section while located at the program.
(6) (a) Prior to searching a person, a person's premises, or a person's vehicle, a peace
officer may inquire as to the presence of needles or other sharp objects in the
areas to be searched that may cut or puncture the officer and offer to not
charge a person with possession of drug paraphernalia if the person declares
to the officer the presence of the needle or other sharp object. If, in response
to the offer, the person admits to the presence of the needle or other sharp
object prior to the search, the person shall not be charged with or prosecuted
for possession of drug paraphernalia for the needle or sharp object or for
Page 32 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1310
unlawful possession of a controlled substance for residual or trace drug
amounts present on the needle or sharp object.
(b) The exemption under this subsection shall not apply to any other drug
paraphernalia that may be present and found during the search or to controlled
substances present in other than residual or trace amounts.
(7) (a) This section shall not prohibit the retail sale of hypodermic syringes and
needles without a prescription in pharmacies.
(b) Hypodermic syringe and needle inventory of a pharmacy shall not be deemed
drug paraphernalia under this section.
(c) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, narcotic drug
testing products utilized in determining whether a controlled substance
contains a synthetic opioid or its analogues shall not be deemed drug
paraphernalia under this section.
2. A narcotic drug testing product that is utilized in conjunction with the
importation, manufacture, or selling of fentanyl or a fentanyl analogue
in violation of this chapter shall be deemed drug paraphernalia under
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, possession of a narcotic
drug testing product used in accordance with paragraph (c)1. of this
subsection that contains residual or trace amounts of a synthetic opioid or an
analogue thereof shall not be prosecuted as unlawful possession of a
controlled substance under any provision of this chapter.
(8) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
Page 33 of 33
XXXX 2/13/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed